Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 3151.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Office.
(1) (A) “Director” means the Director of the Office.

“Office” means the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, or other business entity.

“Private investigator” means any person who, for consideration engages in or solicits business, accepts employment, or holds himself or herself out to the public as someone who will investigate, obtain information, or provide security of persons incident to, but not limited to, the following:

Any suspected crime, tort, or wrong committed or threatened against the laws of a government or any of its political subdivisions or against any person.

The identity, habits, conduct, honesty, loyalty, movements, whereabouts, affiliations, associations, transactions, reputation, or character of any living person.

Damage, accidents, or injury to persons or property.

The location, disposition, or recovery of lost or stolen property.

Evidence related to a proceeding before any court, agency, officer, or investigative committee.

The identity, location, or apprehension of persons.

“Security” means a person engaged for compensation in the business of protecting property or persons by providing armed or unarmed security service, or armed transport service, or the use of guard dogs. “Security services” includes:

Prevention or detection of intrusion, entry, larceny, vandalism, abuse, fire, or trespass on private property.

Prevention, observation, or detection of any unauthorized activity on private property.

Protection of patrons and persons lawfully authorized to be on the premises of the person, firm, association, or corporation that entered into the contract for security services.

Control, regulation, or direction of the flow or movement of the public, whether by vehicle or otherwise, onto the premises.

Physically responding to any alarm signal device, burglar alarm, television camera, still camera, or a mechanical or electronic device installed or used to prevent or detect burglary, theft, shoplifting, pilferage, losses, or other security measures.

Providing armored transport services.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 98

, § 1; amended

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. May 12, 2010;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3151a.
Exemptions.

The term “private investigator” shall not include:

Law enforcement officers certified under

20 V.S.A. § 2358

while engaged in the performance of their official duties.

Insurance adjusters, insurance appraisers, and persons regularly employed as investigators exclusively by one insurance company.

Persons regularly employed as investigators exclusively by one employer in connection with the affairs of that employer only, provided that the employer is not a private investigative agency and the employee is engaged directly as part of the ordinary payroll for tax, accounting, and insurance purposes.

Persons engaged exclusively in the business of furnishing of information as to the business and financial standing and credit responsibility of persons, provided such information is not obtained through the preparation of investigative consumer reports as defined by the Federal Fair Credit Reporting Act.

Attorneys engaged in the practice of law and law clerks, paralegals, and other laypersons regularly employed exclusively by one attorney or law firm when the attorney or law firm retains complete professional responsibility for the work product of the law clerk, paralegal, or other laypersons in his, her, or its employ.

Employees of the federal government, the State, or of any municipality in the performance of official duties.

News gathering persons.

A person engaged in compiling genealogical information from public records.

Persons providing marketing or demographic information.

Authors researching material for publication.

The term “security guard” shall not include:

Law enforcement officers certified under

20 V.S.A. § 2358

while engaged in the performance of their official duties, including the rendering of security guard services, provided such services have been assigned and approved in advance by the officer’s employing department and payment for such services is made to the employing department.

Persons who are not armed, who are engaged exclusively in the business of managing property of others, including incidental inspection for the purpose of discovering damage from entry, theft, vandalism, or other cause.

Persons regularly employed as security guards exclusively by one employer in connection with the affairs of that employer only, provided that the employer is not a security agency and the employee is engaged directly as part of the ordinary payroll for tax, accounting, and insurance purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. May 12, 2010;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.